fr: Type de construction du sol: Drop stitch; En I; Gonflable; Non autovideur; Autovideur; Autre
sv: Typ av stolpkonstruktion: Drop-stitch; I-balk; Uppblåsbar; Ej självlänsande; Självlänsande; Övrigt
fi: Lattian rakennetyyppi: Drop-stitch; I-palkki; Ilmatäytteinen; Ei-itsetyhjentyvä; Itsetyhjentyvä; Muu
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างพื้น: ดรอปสติช; ไอบีม; เป่าลม; ไม่ระบายน้ำเอง; ระบายน้ำเอง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 地板結構類型: 拉絲; 工字樑; 充氣式; 非自動排水; 自動排水; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije tal: Drop-stitch; I-profil; Napihljivo; Brez samodejnega praznjenja; Samodejno praznjenje; Drugo
ja: フロア構造タイプ: ドロップステッチ; Iビーム; インフレータブル; 非自動排水; 自動排水; その他
hu: Padló kialakításának típusa: Drop-stitch; I-gerendás; Felfújható; Nem önürítős; Önürítős; Egyéb
ru: Тип конструкции пола: Drop-stitch; I-beam; Надувное; Несамоотливное; Самоотливное; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije poda: Drop-stitch; I-profil; Na napuhavanje; Bez samopražnjenja; Sa samopražnjenjem; Ostalo
de: Bodenkonstruktionstyp: Drop-Stitch; I-Beam; Aufblasbar; Nicht selbstlenzend; Selbstlenzend; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do piso: Drop-stitch; Viga em I; Insuflável; Sem escoamento automático; Com escoamento automático; Outro
cs: Typ podlahové konstrukce: Drop-stitch; I-profil; Nafukovací; Bez samovylévání; Samovylévací; Ostatní
nb: Konstruksjonstype for gulv: Drop-stitch; I-bjelke; Oppblåsbar; Ikke-selvlensende; Selvlensende; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de construção do piso: Drop-stitch; Viga em I; Inflável; Sem autoesvaziamento; Autoesvaziável; Outro
nl: Type vloerconstructie: Drop-stitch; I-profiel; Opblaasbaar; Niet-zelflozend; Zelflozend; Overige
vi: Loại kết cấu sàn: Drop-stitch; Chữ I; Bơm hơi; Không tự thoát nước; Tự thoát nước; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al podelei: Drop-stitch; I-beam; Gonflabil; Fără autodrenare; Cu autodrenare; Altele
it: Tipo di costruzione del pavimento: Drop-stitch; I-beam; Gonfiabile; Non autosvuotante; Autosvuotante; Altro
tr: Zemin yapısı tipi: Damla dikiş; I-kiriş; Şişirilebilir; Su tahliyesiz; Su tahliyeli; Diğer
da: Gulvkonstruktionstype: Drop-stitch; I-beam; Oppustelig; Ikke-selvlænsende; Selvlænsende; Andet
zh-CN: 底板结构类型: 拉丝; 工字梁; 充气式; 非自排水底; 自排水底; 其他
lt-LT: Grindų konstrukcijos tipas: Dviejų sluoksnių su siūlėmis („Drop-stitch“); I profilio sija; Pripučiamas; Savaime neišleidžiantis vandens; Savaime išleidžiantis vandenį; Kita
pl: Typ konstrukcji podłogi: Drop-stitch; I-beam; Pneumatyczna; Bez samoodpływu; Samoodpływowa; Inna
en: Floor construction type: Drop-stitch; I-beam; Inflatable; Non-self-bailing; Self-bailing; Other
ko: 바닥 구조 유형: 드롭스티치; I 빔; 공기 주입식; 비자연배수; 자연배수; 기타
el: Τύπος κατασκευής δαπέδου: Drop-stitch; I-beam; Φουσκωτό; Μη αυτοαδειαζόμενο; Αυτοαδειαζόμενο; Άλλο
es: Tipo de construcción de piso: Drop-stitch; Viga en I; Inflable; No autovaciable; Autovaciable; Otro
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie podlahy: Drop-stitch; I-nosník; Nafukovací; Bez samovylievania; Samovylievací; Iné
bg-BG: Вид конструкция на пода: Drop-stitch; I-образен профил; Надуваем; Без самоотводняване; Със самоотводняване; Друго